Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 7. Claims Against Estate

Cross references. —

As to combining notice to creditors and notice to show cause why exempt property should not be set over to persons entitled, see §

2-7-505

.

As to requirement of filing claims within time period, see §

2-7-703

.

As to Uniform Estate Tax Apportionment Act, see §

2-10-101

et seq.

As to actions for wrongful death, see §§

1-38-101

and

1-38-102

.

As to right of heirs, executors, administrators, etc., to redeem real property sold under mortgage or execution within three months, see §

1-18-103

et seq.

As to sale of corporate stock under execution or attachment, see §§

1-19-101

to

1-19-108

.

As to property exempt from execution or attachment, see §

1-20-101

et seq.

As to quieting title, ejectment and rights of occupying claimants with reference to real property, see §

1-32-201

et seq.

For duty of administrator, executor or trustee to pay inheritance taxes, see §

39-19-107

.

§ 2-7-701.
Debts and charges; classification.

In any estate in which the assets are or appear to be insufficient to pay in full all debts and charges of the estate, the personal representative shall classify debts and charges as follows:

Court costs;

Other costs of administration;

Reasonable funeral and burial expenses;

Allowances payable under W.S.

2-7-503

and

2-7-504

;

All debts and taxes having preference under the laws of the United States;

Reasonable and necessary medical and hospital expenses of the last illness of the decedent, including compensation of persons attending him at his last illness;

All taxes having preferences under the laws of this state;

All debts owing to employees for labor performed during the ninety (90) days next preceding the death of the decedent;

All claims allowed under W.S.

2-7-707

;

All other claims allowed.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 1981, ch. 151, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Ungrateful Living: An Estate Planner's Nightmare — The Trial Attorney's Dream,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 401 (1989).

§ 2-7-702.
Debts and charges; order of payment.

Payment of debts and charges of the estate shall be made in the order provided in the preceding section [§

2-7-701

] without preference of any claim over another of the same class. If the assets of the estate are insufficient to pay in full all of the claims of a class, then the claims shall be paid on a pro rata basis without preference between claims then due and those of the same class not due.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-7-703.
Filing required; failure to do so constitutes bar; exceptions.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, all claims whether due, not due or contingent, shall be filed in duplicate with the clerk within the time limited in the notice to creditors and any claim not so filed is barred forever. Any claimant to whom the personal representative has mailed a notice pursuant to W.S. 2-7-205(a)(ii) shall file his claim within three (3) months after the date of first publication of the notice in the newspaper, or before the expiration of thirty (30) days after the mailing, whichever date is later, and any claim not so filed is barred forever. If only one (1) copy of a claim is filed, the clerk shall make a duplicate and shall charge the claimant a reasonable fee not to exceed two dollars ($2.00) per page.

The clerk shall forthwith transmit to the personal representative one (1) copy of each claim when and as filed.

This section shall not bar:

Claimants entitled to equitable relief due to peculiar circumstances, if so found by the court in adversary proceedings; or

A claimant to whom no notice was mailed pursuant to W.S. 2-7-205(a)(ii), if the court in adversary proceedings finds that the identity of the claimant was reasonably ascertainable by the personal representative within the time limited in the notice to creditors published pursuant to W.S.

2-7-201

.

Any claim not in excess of two hundred dollars ($200.00) may be allowed by the personal representative without the filing of the claim by the creditor, but the personal representative is answerable for the propriety thereof upon hearing on his final report and accounting.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 14, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 4749; C.S. 1910, § 5618; C.S. 1920, § 6889; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 134; R.S. 1931, § 88-3103; C.S. 1945, § 6-1603; W.S. 1957, § 2-221; W.S. 1977, §

2-6-203

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 1989, ch. 114, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to presumption notices properly published, see §

2-2-111

.

As to barring of claims upon failure of creditors to apply for letters within time prescribed, see §

2-4-212

.

As to notice requirements, see §

2-7-201

.

Editor's notes. —

Any pre-1980 cases below were decided prior to the 1980 revision of title 2 which extensively changed this section by rewriting the latter part of subsection (a), providing an exception where there was a lack of notice by reason of being out of the state, and by adding subsections (b), (c) and (d).

Claims not filed within time limit mandatorily barred. —

The legislature has mandatorily barred creditors' claims against the estate of a decedent probated in this state, unless such claims are presented and filed within the definitely limited time prescribed. Estate of Peterson, 75 Wyo. 416, 296 P.2d 504,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1956).

Neither an administrator nor the presiding judge is clothed with authority to allow a claim not filed within the limit prescribed. Estate of Peterson, 75 Wyo. 416, 296 P.2d 504,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1956).

Creditor's first claim was timely filed under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 2-7-703(a) and then was properly rejected by the estate, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

2-7-718

; the creditor's sole and exclusive remedy was to comply with §

2-7-718

and bring suit in a proper court against the estate within 30 days, which it failed to do and its claim was time barred.
Beit Hanina Enters. v. Moffett (In re Estate of Andrew), 2011 WY 165, 267 P.3d 1070,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 2011).

Term “all claims”

is comprehensive and indicates upon its face that it includes claims of every character whether the same be due, not due or contingent. Lindsay v. Collins, 96 F. Supp. 994, 1951 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2554 (D. Wyo. 1951).

Includes those for wrongful death. —

Failure to file claim against the estate of the decedent for damages in connection with the death of two children killed in the same accident with the decedent barred recovery in an action for recovery of the same damages. Lo Sasso v. Braun, 386 P.2d 630,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1963).

And claims by state. —

The failure to except the state from the barring provision of this section makes necessary the plain implication that the lawmaking arm of the state's government did not intend that the state should be relieved of the requirement. State ex rel. Bd. of Charities & Reform v. Bower, 362 P.2d 814,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 363 P.2d 791,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 104

(Wyo. 1961).

Reimbursement of Medicaid payments. —

The State Department of Health, Division of Health Care Financing is subject to the requirements of subsection (a) and must file a notice of claim for reimbursement of medicaid payments against the estate within the time frames dictated therein. State ex rel. Department of Health, Div. of Health Care Fin. v. Campbell (In re Estate of Campbell), 950 P.2d 557,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1997).

Reimbursement claims against wrongful death proceeds not barred.—

The bar set forth in this section against claims not filed in a timely manner against a decedent's estate does not operate to bar a claim by the state for reimbursement of worker's compensation benefits from wrongful death proceeds, because wrongful death proceeds are not part of the decedent's estate. West v. Wyoming State Treasurer, 822 P.2d 1269,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. 1991).

Claim filed by state in guardianship before administrationheld not to comply. —

See State ex rel. Bd. of Charities & Reform v. Bower, 362 P.2d 814,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 363 P.2d 791,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 104

(Wyo. 1961).

Claim of United States barred in state court. —

A court decreeing payment of a claim of the United States which was filed after end of statutory period following first publication of notice exceeded its jurisdiction, and decree was subject to reversal. Estate of Peterson, 75 Wyo. 416, 296 P.2d 504,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1956).

But not by federal court. —

This section did not bar an action by the United States against an estate on a note executed by the deceased in connection with a federal housing administration loan though the claim was filed in the estate after the statutory filing period had expired, since the United States is not bound by a state statute of limitations. United States v. Deimer, 140 F. Supp. 88, 1953 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1965 (D. Wyo. 1953).

Issuance of letters of administration held not to control time for filing claim

if probate proceedings have previously been opened by the filing of a petition for probate. Park County ex rel. Park County Welfare Dep't v. Blackburn, 394 P.2d 793,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1964).

Term “barred”

is a technical term and is applied to actions or suits. Estate of Peterson, 75 Wyo. 416, 296 P.2d 504,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1956).

Section

2-7-717

, requiring holder of claim against an estate to present it to executor or administrator before bringing action thereon, and this section, requiring all claims whether due, not due or contingent, to be filed within time limited in the notice, or be forever barred, refer to the same thing, “barred” applying to action or suit. Dallas Dome Wyoming Oil Fields Co. v. Brooder, 55 Wyo. 109, 97 P.2d 311,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1939).

Section does not render invalid debts

which are otherwise valid and subsisting, although they do bar the collection or payment of the debt from assets in the hands of a personal representative who, under our law, must apply those assets only in the manner, to the extent and under the conditions prescribed by the legislature of this state. Thus, in a probate proceeding respecting the assets of the deceased situate in some other jurisdiction, the identical claim which has become forever barred in this state for failure to properly file the same in accordance with our laws and procedure may be required to be paid and the property of the deceased so situated elsewhere may be subjected to the payment of the debt, provided the laws and procedures of that other jurisdiction are observed and complied with. Estate of Peterson, 75 Wyo. 416, 296 P.2d 504,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1956).

But timely presentation of claim in probate is prerequisite to maintaining action thereon.

Lo Sasso v. Braun, 386 P.2d 630,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1963); In re Estate of Baker, 483 P.2d 513,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 211

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 484 P.2d 1175,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 1971).

Inasmuch as a claim was not presented during the time allowed by statute, plaintiff could not state a cause of action against defendant upon which relief could be granted, and the district court properly dismissed the action. Lo Sasso v. Braun, 386 P.2d 630,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1963).

Presentation of claim and its disallowance or delay in allowing are necessary allegations

in an action against an executor or administrator. Lo Sasso v. Braun, 386 P.2d 630,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1963).

Failure to allege filing of claim not waived. —

In an action for damages in federal court against estate of a deceased wrongdoer, the administrator did not waive the failure of the plaintiff to allege that the claim upon which an action was brought had been filed in the estate because of the fact that the administrator had appeared through counsel and made a general answer consisting of a general denial and a plea of contributory negligence as well as a cross-claim for alleged negligence of the plaintiff. Lindsay v. Collins, 96 F. Supp. 994, 1951 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2554 (D. Wyo. 1951).

Mortgagee need not present claim where widow claims homestead.—

Where husband and wife executed mortgage before husband's death and wife thereafter claimed homestead, which was not divisible and worth over statutory homestead amount, mortgage holder was not required to present claim to widow as executrix. Delfelder v. Teton Land & Inv. Co., 46 Wyo. 142, 24 P.2d 702,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 46 Wyo. 142, 26 P.2d 153,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1933).

Nor present claim for deficiency if original claim rejected.—

Mortgagee whose claim against deceased mortgagor's estate was rejected was entitled to maintain an action for deficiency remaining unpaid after application of proceeds of sale of mortgaged property pursuant to power of sale to a reduction of the debt, notwithstanding no claim for amount of deficiency was ever presented to representative of mortgagor's estate. Denver Joint Stock Land Bank v. Preston, 52 Wyo. 132, 70 P.2d 584,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1937).

But default judgment erroneous without presentation. —

Where administrator appears in an action against him for foreclosure of a mortgage, the petition in which does not aver presentation of the claim in an action, nor waive recourse against the estate, judgment by default against him for a deficiency and for attorney's fees is erroneous, under §

2-7-717

, requiring presentation of claim before an action is brought, except where petition expressly waives recourse against property of estate. O'Keefe v. Foster, 5 Wyo. 343, 40 P. 525,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1895).

Creditor can recover amount greater than specified in its claim against estate where

the original claim reserves the right to amend the claim from time to time, said reservation is reasonable due to confused records of the parties and deaths of material witnesses, and the claimant moves at trial to amend the claim and the defendant is not prejudiced thereby. Yost v. Harpel Oil Co., 674 P.2d 712,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 392

(Wyo. 1983).

Reopening of estate. —

It is within the district court's discretion to require the party seeking to reopen the estate to make a prima facie showing to support its allegations before requiring the personal representative to submit to discovery; therefore, the denial of a motion to reopen an estate was reversed and remanded where a strong showing standard was incorrectly used. Strngari v. Taylor (In re Estate of Novakovich), 2004 WY 158, 101 P.3d 931,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 2004).

Peculiar circumstances not found. —

“Peculiar circumstances” under subsection (c)(i) would not apply to set of facts where (1) plaintiff was injured, allegedly by his father; (2) plaintiff's father died; (3) an estate was opened to provide plaintiff with a defendant to sue; (4) plaintiff was sent a Notice of Probate requiring claims against the estate to be filed by a certain date; and (5) no claim was filed. Scott v. Scott, 918 P.2d 198,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1996).

Notice required. —

Creditor of an estate is entitled to personal notice of probate if a personal representative knows of the creditor's identity or if, through due diligence based on the information available to the personal representative, the creditor's identity is reasonably ascertainable. A personal representative's argument that a personal injury claim was too speculative as to require notice during probate proceedings was rejected. Strngari v. Taylor (In re Estate of Novakovich), 2004 WY 158, 101 P.3d 931,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 2004).

Notice to creditors by publication. —

Nothing in any of the probate statutes contemplates an individual notification to a creditor except by publication of notice to creditors. Such constructive notice is given to all creditors inside and outside of Wyoming. In re Estate of Baker, 484 P.2d 1175,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 1971).

Adversary proceeding. —

Hearing to determine whether a petitioner can make a prima facie showing would qualify as an adversary proceeding under this section in determining whether or not to reopen a closed estate. Such a hearing takes into consideration the due process concerns because it gives a creditor an opportunity to show that the creditor was reasonably ascertainable. Strngari v. Taylor (In re Estate of Novakovich), 2004 WY 158, 101 P.3d 931,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 2004).

Creditor estopped from claiming lack of notice. —

Where notice was duly published as required by this section, and plaintiff litigated his claim for a period of two years against administrator, he cannot, on being defeated, and after time for filing claims has expired, claim lack of knowledge of publication of notice to enable him to file claim under this section. Thomas v. Bivin, 34 Wyo. 317, 243 P. 130,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1926).

Prior permitted use of affidavit by claimants showing lackof notice because out of state. —

See Associated Aviation Underwriters v. Smith, 597 P.2d 964,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 432

(Wyo. 1979).

Applied

in

Roberts v. Roberts, 64 Wyo. 455, 64 Wyo. 433, 197 P.2d 697,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(1948).

Quoted

in

Tschirgi v. Meyer, 536 P.2d 558,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 1975).

Stated

in

Kuntz v. Kinne, 395 P.2d 286,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1964).

Cited

in

Delfelder v. Farmers' State Bank, 38 Wyo. 481, 269 P. 418,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(1928); In re Demorest's Estate, 41 Wyo. 189, 283 P. 1097,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(1930); In re Estate of Gibbs, 73 Wyo. 425, 280 P.2d 556,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1955); Harris v. Taylor, 969 P.2d 142,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 1998); Rodriguez v. Casey, 2002 WY 111, 50 P.3d 323,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2002); Bell v. Schell, 2004 WY 153, 101 P.3d 465,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(2004).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” 8 Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Exclusiveness of grounds enumerated in statute providing, under specified circumstances, extension of time for filing claims against decedent's estate, 57 ALR2d 1304.

Appealability of order, of court possessing probate jurisdiction, allowing or denying tardy presentation of claim to personal representative, 66 ALR2d 659.

Validity of claims against estate filed prior to publication of notice to creditors, 70 ALR3d 784.

§ 2-7-704.
Affidavit and other required supporting documentation.

Every claim which is due, when filed with the clerk shall be supported by the affidavit of the claimant or someone in his behalf, that the account is justly due, that no payments have been made thereon which are not credited and there are no offsets to the same to the knowledge of the affiant. If the claim is not due when filed or is contingent the particulars of the claim shall be stated. The personal representative may also require satisfactory vouchers or proofs to be produced in support of the claim.

If the claim is founded on a bond, bill, note or any other instrument, a copy of the instrument shall accompany the claim. The original instrument shall be exhibited to the personal representative, if demanded, unless it is lost or destroyed, in which case the claimant shall accompany his claim by his affidavit containing a copy or particular description of the instrument and stating its loss or destruction. If the claim or any part thereof is secured by a mortgage or other lien which has been recorded in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the land affected by it lies, it is sufficient to describe the mortgage or lien and refer to the date, volume and page of its record.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 14, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 4750; C.S. 1910, § 5619; C.S. 1920, § 6890; R.S. 1931, § 88-3104; C.S. 1945, § 6-1604; W.S. 1957, § 2-222; W.S. 1977, §

2-6-204

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Cases appearing below and decided prior to 1980 may relate to language in this section as it read prior to the 1980 revision of title 2 which deleted part of subsection (a) relating to when an affidavit was made by one other than the claimant and added subsection (b).

There is no requirement that creditor's claim be signed by claimant.

Edmonds v. Valley Nat'l Bank, 518 P.2d 7,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Wyo. 1974).

But only that claim be supported by affidavit

of the claimant or someone in his behalf is required. Edmonds v. Valley Nat'l Bank, 518 P.2d 7,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Wyo. 1974).

Unverified claim sent in letter to estate's attorney not properlysubmitted. —

A claim against an estate, sent in a letter to the attorney for the estate, but not verified, was not properly submitted and its payment could not be enforced. Litzenberger v. Merge, 698 P.2d 1152,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 476

(Wyo. 1985).

Purpose of affidavit. —

The requirements for an affidavit supporting a claim against an estate are not intended to make it easier to avoid payment but are intended to make a claimant set forth his claim with such particularity that the person passing upon it will be fully advised as to just what is claimed. Park County ex rel. Park County Welfare Dep't v. Blackburn, 394 P.2d 793,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1964).

Verification of claim by corporation. —

A corporation cannot itself verify a claim but must do so by an officer or person authorized to make such affidavit. Edmonds v. Valley Nat'l Bank, 518 P.2d 7,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Wyo. 1974).

Substantial compliance with section is all that is required

where there is an opportunity for the person passing upon the claim to require further proof. Park County ex rel. Park County Welfare Dep't v. Blackburn, 394 P.2d 793,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1964).

A copy of a note is sufficient statement of the particularity of a claim.

Edmonds v. Valley Nat'l Bank, 518 P.2d 7,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Wyo. 1974).

Section ambiguous when payment contingent upon judge's discretion.—

This section is somewhat ambiguous when applied to a claim which is contingent upon the district judge in his discretion ordering it paid or not ordering it paid. Park County ex rel. Park County Welfare Dep't v. Blackburn, 394 P.2d 793,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1964).

Section clearly places burden upon executor

by virtue of the provision that the representative may also require vouchers and proof. Edmonds v. Valley Nat'l Bank, 518 P.2d 7,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Wyo. 1974).

Claim filed by state in guardianship before administrationdoes not comply. —

See State ex rel. Bd. of Charities & Reform v. Bower, 362 P.2d 814,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 363 P.2d 791,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 104

(Wyo. 1961).

Issuance of letters of administration held not to control time for filing claim

if probate proceedings have previously been opened by the filing of a petition for probate. Park County ex rel. Park County Welfare Dep't v. Blackburn, 394 P.2d 793,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1964).

Quoted

in

Tschirgi v. Meyer, 536 P.2d 558,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 1975).

Cited

in

In re Estate of Baker, 483 P.2d 513,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 211

(Wyo. 1971).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Amendment of claim against decedent's estate, introducing new or different claim or effecting substantial change in claim, 56 ALR2d 627.

§ 2-7-705.
Future, contingent and unliquidated claims.

If a claim which will become due at a future time or a contingent or unliquidated claim becomes due or certain before the distribution of the estate, and the claim has been allowed or established by a proceeding, it is paid in the same manner as presently due and absolute claims of the same class.

In other cases the personal representative, or on petition of the personal representative or the claimant in a special proceeding the court, may provide for payment as follows:

If the claimant consents he may be paid the present or agreed value of the claim taking any uncertainty into account;

Arrangement for future payment or possible payment on the happening of the contingency or on liquidation may be made by creating a trust, giving a mortgage, obtaining a bond or security from a distributee, or otherwise.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

“Future claims.” —

The claims at issue which were ‘future claims’ unliquidated at the time the initial notice of claim against the estate was filed, but which became certain after that time, should have been handled according to the provisions of subsection (a) of this section. State ex rel. Department of Health, Div. of Health Care Fin. v. Campbell (In re Estate of Campbell), 950 P.2d 557,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1997).

§ 2-7-706.
Claim based on cause of action surviving decedent's death.

Where a cause of action against the decedent survives his death under W.S.

1-4-101

and

1-4-102

, before an action may be brought thereon in any court, a claim based thereon shall be filed and shall have been rejected by the personal representative. The running of the applicable statute of limitations on the cause of action shall be tolled from the time the claim is filed until five (5) days after the date of mailing of notice of rejection by the personal representative. Any judgment rendered by any court with respect to which compliance with this section has not been accomplished, if sought to be enforced, shall be deemed to be a claim not timely filed under W.S.

2-7-703

.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Failure to provide notice. —

Personal representative's failure to provide actual notice to husband, as a known creditor of wife's estate, precluded finding that husband had obligation to file notice of claim against estate within statutory time frame. Harris v. Taylor, 969 P.2d 142,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 1998).

Applied

in

Scott v. Scott, 918 P.2d 198,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1996).

Quoted

in

Rodriguez v. Casey, 2002 WY 111, 50 P.3d 323,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2002).

§ 2-7-707.
Repayment of public assistance.

If any recipient of assistance under statutes of Wyoming governing programs of public welfare dies possessed of money or property and a claim for repayment of such assistance is filed against the estate of the deceased, the court in which the estate is being probated shall order the claim to be paid out of the assets of the estate after the claims in W.S. 2-7-701(a)(i) through (viii) are paid and satisfied. No claim for repayment of assistance shall be enforced against any property of the estate that may be necessary for the support, maintenance or education of the decedent’s surviving spouse, minor child or other dependent.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 99, § 1; 1951, ch. 110, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 2-242; Laws 1961, ch. 117, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 2-6-224; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Applied

in

Park County ex rel. Park County Welfare Dep't v. Blackburn, 394 P.2d 793,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1964).

§ 2-7-708.
Personal claims of personal representatives.

If the personal representative is a creditor of the decedent he shall file his claim as other creditors, and the court shall appoint a competent person as temporary administrator to represent the estate in the matter of allowing or disallowing the claim. The same procedure shall be followed in the case of co-representatives where all the representatives are creditors of the estate. If one of the co-representatives is not a creditor of the estate, the disinterested representative shall represent the estate in the matter of allowing or disallowing the claim against the estate by a co-representative.

The temporary administrator, after investigation, shall file a report with the court recommending the allowance or disallowance of the claim. Unless the court allows the claim, it shall be disposed of as a contested claim in accordance with W.S.

2-7-717

through

2-7-719

.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-7-709.
Actions pending against decedent at time of death.

Any action, including any counterclaim in any pending action, pending against the decedent at the time of his death that survives shall be filed as a claim within the time provided in W.S.

2-7-703

by filing with the clerk in duplicate a certified copy of the order of the court in which the action is pending substituting the personal representative for the decedent, together with a certified copy of any pleading asserting contentions against the decedent. Any judgment thereafter rendered in the pending action shall be subject to the provisions of W.S.

2-7-719

. If no claim is filed as provided in this section, any judgment rendered in the pending action, if sought to be enforced, shall be deemed to be a claim not timely filed under W.S.

2-7-703

.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-7-710.
Judgments rendered against decedent before death; execution thereon limited.

When any judgment has been rendered against the decedent in his lifetime, no execution shall issue thereon after his death unless the judgment is for the recovery of real or personal property or the enforcement of a lien thereon. A judgment against the decedent for the recovery of money shall be filed with the clerk like any other claim. If execution is levied upon any property of the decedent before his death, the property may be sold for the satisfaction thereof, and the officer making the sale shall account to the personal representative for any surplus in his hands.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 14, § 14; R.S. 1899, § 4760; C.S. 1910, § 5629; C.S. 1920, § 6900; R.S. 1931, § 88-3114; C.S. 1945, § 6-1614; W.S. 1957, § 2-232; W.S. 1977, § 2-6-214; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Petition in action against grantee of deceased judgment debtor

is an action to enforce a judgment lien, in view of this section. Stephenson v. Lichtenstein, 24 Wyo. 417, 160 P. 1170,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1916).

Cited

in

First Nat'l Bank v. Ludvigsen, 8 Wyo. 230, 56 P. 994,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(1899).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

§ 2-7-711.
Judgments rendered against decedent after death.

A judgment rendered against a decedent who dies after verdict or decision on an issue of fact but before judgment is rendered thereon shall be filed with the clerk like any other claim. The time within which the judgment shall be filed shall not expire until ten (10) days from and after the date final judgment is entered if the date is later than the time for filing claims provided in W.S.

2-7-703

.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 14, § 15; R.S. 1899, § 4761; C.S. 1910, § 5630; C.S. 1920, § 6901; R.S. 1931, § 88-3115; C.S. 1945, § 6-1615; W.S. 1957, § 2-233; W.S. 1977, § 2-6-215; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cited

in

First Nat'l Bank v. Ludvigsen, 8 Wyo. 230, 56 P. 994,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(1899).

§ 2-7-712.
Allowance and rejection of claims.

When a claim, accompanied by the affidavit required in W.S.

2-7-704

, has been filed with the clerk, the personal representative shall allow or reject it and his allowance or rejection shall be in writing and filed with the clerk within thirty (30) days after the expiration of the time for filing claims.

If the claim is filed with the clerk before the expiration of the time limited for the filing of claims, the same is filed in time though acted upon by the personal representative after the expiration of such time.

Every claim allowed by the personal representative shall be ranked among the acknowledged debts of the estate to be paid in due course of administration.

When a claim has been filed with the clerk and is rejected in whole or in part, the personal representative shall immediately upon rejection notify the claimant by certified mail.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 14, § 5; R.S. 1899, § 4751; C.S. 1910, § 5620; C.S. 1920, § 6891; Laws 1925, ch. 93, § 2; 1931, ch. 73, § 135; R.S. 1931, § 88-3105; C.S. 1945, § 6-1605; W.S. 1957, § 2-223; W.S. 1977, §

2-6-205

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Failure to fulfill requirements of subsection (a),

assuming no estoppel is present, merely prevents the triggering of §

2-7-718

and the running of the 30-day period in which a suit must be filed for the rejected claim. Zmijewski v. Wright, 809 P.2d 280,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1991).

Notice of rejected claim must be given by certified mail. —

Where notice of a rejected claim is not given by certified mail as required by subsection (d), the 30-day period prescribed by §

2-7-718

does not begin to run and a subsequent judicial action is not barred. Hanson v. Estate of Belden, 668 P.2d 1331,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 358

(Wyo. 1983).

District court properly granted an estate's motion to dismiss a creditor's complaint as untimely because, while the certified mailing to the creditor was not constitutionally adequate notice, the estate strictly complied with the statutory notice requirements by filing the notice of rejection in district court and mailing the rejection notice to the creditor via certified mail, and the creditor failed to timely file its complaint after receiving constitutionally adequate notice of the estate's claim rejection. Accelerated Receivable Solutions v. Hauf, 2015 WY 71, 350 P.3d 731,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 2015).

Claim cannot be filed before probate proceedings commenced. —

The language employed in this section affirmatively states that if the claim is filed with the clerk “before” expiration of the time limited, it is filed in time; but this does not infer that a proper claim could be filed with the clerk before proceedings are commenced for probate of an estate. Park County ex rel. Park County Welfare Dep't v. Blackburn, 394 P.2d 793,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1964).

Claim for expense of caring for ward. —

State's failure to present claim for expense of caring for insane ward in state hospital to such person's guardian before ward's death did not bar presentation thereof to administrator of her estate. State v. Thompson, 45 Wyo. 350, 18 P.2d 619,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1933).

Limitation does not apply to executor's or administrator's claim. —

Section

2-7-718

, imposing three months (now 30 days) limitation on actions by claimants whose claims have been rejected by executor or administrator does not apply to an executor's or administrator's claim rejected by a judge. Roberts v. Roberts, 62 Wyo. 77, 162 P.2d 117,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1945).

Until successor appointed. —

See Roberts v. Roberts, 62 Wyo. 77, 162 P.2d 117,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1945).

Limitation period runs from mailing of rejection. —

Where defendant succeeded plaintiff as administratrix of estate, appointment, for purposes of limitation, automatically changed character of plaintiff's claim against estate, but limitation period did not commence to run on plaintiff's claim as ordinary creditor until date of mailing of notice of rejection by defendant. Roberts v. Roberts, 62 Wyo. 77, 162 P.2d 117,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1945).

Action by former administratrix commenced in time. —

Action commenced by former administratrix less than three months (now 30 days) after rejection of claim by successor administrator was timely notwithstanding probate judge had rejected claim while claimant was serving as administratrix. Roberts v. Roberts, 62 Wyo. 77, 162 P.2d 117,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1945).

Applied

in

State ex rel. State Bd. of Charities & Reform v. Bower, 362 P.2d 814,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 1961).

Quoted

in

Scott v. Scott, 918 P.2d 198,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1996).

Stated

in

Noyes v. First Nat'l Bank, 589 P.2d 384,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 350

(Wyo. 1979).

Cited

in

Delfelder v. Farmers' State Bank, 38 Wyo. 481, 269 P. 418,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(1928); Rodriguez v. Casey, 2002 WY 111, 50 P.3d 323,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2002); Strngari v. Taylor (In re Estate of Novakovich), 2004 WY 158, 101 P.3d 931,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(2004).

Law reviews. —

See “The Curative Act and the Probate Code,” 3 Wyo. L.J. 204.

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes rejection of claim against estate to commence running of statute of limitations applicable to rejected claims, 36 ALR4th 684.

§ 2-7-713.
Claims allowed in part.

Whenever the personal representative allows a claim in part, he shall state in his report to the clerk the amount he allows. If the creditor refuses to accept the amount allowed in full satisfaction of his claim, he shall recover no costs in any action brought against the personal representative unless he is granted judgment for a greater amount than that allowed.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 14, § 12; R.S. 1899, § 4758; C.S. 1910, § 5627; C.S. 1920, § 6898; R.S. 1931, § 88-3112; C.S. 1945, § 6-1612; W.S. 1957, § 2-230; W.S. 1977, § 2-6-212; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-7-714.
Claims barred by statute of limitations precluded.

No claim shall be allowed by the personal representative which is barred by the statute of limitations.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 14, § 8; R.S. 1899, § 4754; C.S. 1910, § 5623; C.S. 1920, § 6894; R.S. 1931, § 88-3108; C.S. 1945, § 6-1608; W.S. 1957, § 2-226; W.S. 1977, §

2-6-208

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Claim must be rejected though no pleading barred by limitationshas been interposed. —

A claim must be rejected if it appears at any time during the pendency of a case that the claim upon which an action is brought is in fact barred by a statute of limitations, even though no pleading that the claim is barred by a statute of limitations has been interposed. Ellis v. Cauhaupe, 71 Wyo. 475, 260 P.2d 309,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1953).

Limitation does not apply to executor's or administrator'sclaim. —

Section

2-7-718

imposing three months (now 30 days) limitation on actions by claimants whose claims have been rejected by executor or administrator does not apply to an executor's or administrator's claim rejected by a judge. Roberts v. Roberts, 62 Wyo. 77, 162 P.2d 117,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1945).

Right of action does not depend on judge's investigation. —

Right of claimant to bring action against the estate after claim is rejected does not depend on nature of judge's investigation, it being noted that allowance of claims may be contested by heirs. Roberts v. Roberts, 62 Wyo. 77, 162 P.2d 117,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1945).

And judge's rejection does not bar action. —

This section does not purport to provide what claimant may do after rejection by the judge, and accordingly, it does not bar an action by claimant upon rejection of claim. Roberts v. Roberts, 62 Wyo. 77, 162 P.2d 117,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1945).

Quoted

in

Lindsay v. Collins, 96 F. Supp. 994, 1951 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2554 (D. Wyo. 1951).

Cited

in

O'Keefe v. Foster, 5 Wyo. 343, 40 P. 525,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(1895); Delfelder v. Farmers' State Bank, 38 Wyo. 481, 269 P. 418,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(1928).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).